Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1984
Quorum; voting.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, the articles, or bylaws, a quorum of a board of directors consists of a majority of the directors in office immediately before a meeting begins. In no event may the articles or bylaws authorize a quorum of fewer than the greater of one-third of the number of directors in office or two directors.

(b) If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board unless the act, the articles, or bylaws require the vote of a greater number of directors.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 84.